en: low moisture part skim mozzarella
hr: niske vlažnosti dio obrane mozzarelle
it: mozzarella parzialmente scremata a bassa umidità

en: low moisture whole milk mozzarella
hr: mozzarella od punomasnog mlijeka niske vlažnosti
it: mozzarella di latte intero a bassa umidità

en: Muenster cheese, Muenster
es: Muenster
hr: muensterski sir
it: formaggio Muenster
jv: Kèju Muenster
sv: Muenster
th: มึนสเตอร์ชีส

en: Munster, Munster cheeses, Munster cheese from cow's milk
xx: Munsters, Munster
ar: مونستير
be: Мюнстэр
bg: Мюнстер
ca: Munster
cv: Мюнстер
de: Münsterkäse
es: Munster
eu: Munster
fi: Munster
fr: Munsters, Munster, Munster-Géromé
hr: munster
id: Keju Munster
ja: マンステール
ko: 묑스테르
la: Munster
ms: Keju Munster
nb: Munster
nl: Munster
pl: Munster
pt: Munster
ru: Мюнстер
sv: Munster
th: เมิงสแตร์ชีส
uk: Мюнстер
zh: 芒斯特芝士

en: neufchâtel
xx: neufchâtel
ar: نيوفتشيتيل
be: Нёшатэль
cv: Невшатель
hy: Նյոշատել
id: Keju Neufchâtel
ja: ヌシャテル
ko: 뇌샤텔
ru: Нёшатель
uk: Ньошатель
zh: 紐沙特起司

en: Oscypek
hr: oscypek
it: oscypek
pl: oscypek

en: Ossau-Iraty
xx: Ossau-Iraty
ar: اوساو يراتى
ca: Ossau-Irati
el: Οσό-Ιρατί
eu: Ossau-Irati
ja: オッソー・イラティ
ko: 오소이라티
oc: Aussau-Irati
ru: Оссо-Ирати
uk: Оссо-Іраті
zh: 伊拉堤芝士

en: parmigiano reggiano, parmesan, Parmesan cheese, parmigiano reggiano cheese, Parmesan cheese from cow's milk
af: Parmesaan
ar: بارميجيانو ريجيانو
az: Parmesan pendiri
ba: пармезан
be: Пармезан
bg: Пармезан
br: Parmezan, Parmigiano Reggiano
ca: formatge parmesà
cs: Parmezán
cv: Пармиджано Реджано
cy: Caws Parmesan
da: Parmesan, Parmigiano-Reggiano
de: Parmesan, parmigiano reggiano, Parmigiano Reggiano Käse
el: Παρμεζάνα
eo: Parma fromaĝo
es: queso parmesano
et: Parmesan, parma juust
eu: Parmigiano-Reggiano
fa: پنیر پارمیجانو
fi: parmesaani, parmigiano-reggiano, parmesanjuusto, parmesaanijuusto
fr: parmesan, parmigiano reggiano, fromage parmigiano reggiano, fromage parmigiano reggiano aop, fromage parmigiano reggiano dop
gl: Parmesano
he: פרמזן
hr: parmezan, Parmigiano Reggiano, sir Parmigiano Reggiano
hu: Parmezán, Parmigiano Reggiano
hy: Պարմեզան
id: Parmesan, Parmigiano-Reggiano
is: Parmesan
it: parmigiano reggiano, formaggio parmigiano reggiano
ja: パルメザン, パルミジャーノ・レッジャーノ
jv: Parmigiano-Reggiano
ka: ಪಾರ್ಮಜ಼ಾನ್ ಚೀಸ್
ko: 파르미자노 레자노
la: Parmensis
lt: Parmezanas
lv: Parmezāns
ms: Parmesan, Parmigiano-Reggiano
nb: parmesan
nl: Parmezaanse kaas, Parmigiano reggiano
pl: Parmezan
pt: Parmesão
ro: Parmezan
ru: Пармезан
sh: Parmiđano ređano
sk: Parmezán
sl: Parmezan
sr: пармезан
sv: parmesan, parmigiano-reggiano, parmesanost
tl: Parmigiano-Reggiano
tr: Parmesan peyniri
uk: Пармезан
vi: Pho mát Parmesan
yi: פארמעזאן
zh: 帕馬森乾酪

en: Pecorino, Pecorino cheese
xx: pecorino
bg: Пекорино
cv: Пекорино
de: Pecorino, Pecorino Romano Käse g.U.
el: Πεκορίνο
fr: pecorino, fromage pecorino
he: פקורינו
hr: pecorino
hu: Pecorino, Pecorino sajt
hy: Պեկորինո
it: Pecorino, formaggio pecorino
ja: ペコリーノ
ko: 페코리노
la: Pecorinus
ru: Пекорино
sv: pecorino, pecorino-ost
uk: Пекоріно
zh: 義大利綿羊乾酪

en: pecorino romano, pecorino romano cheese, Peccorino Romano PDO cheese
bg: Пекорино Романо, сирене Пекорино Романо ЗГН
da: Pecorino Romano, Pecorino Romano ost
de: Pecorino Romano
es: Pecorino romano, queso DOP Pecorino romano
fi: Pecorino romano
fr: pecorino romano, romano, fromage pecorino romano aop
hr: pecorino romano, pecorino romano DOP, sir pecorino romano DOP
it: Pecorino romano
nl: pecorino romano, pecorino romano kaas

en: pont l'evêque
xx: pont l'evêque
ar: پونت ليڤيكو
ja: ポン・レヴェック
ko: 퐁레베크
ru: Пон-л’Эвек
uk: Пон-л'Евек
zh: 龐特伊維克芝士

en: romano cheese, romano
de: Romano-Käse, Romano
es: Queso romano
fr: Fromage Romano
hr: romano sir
it: formaggio tipo Pecorino Romano

en: provolone, provolone cheese
af: Provolone
ca: Provolone
de: provolone, provolone käse
eo: Provolono
es: Provolone
fi: provolone
fr: provolone, fromage provolone
he: פרובולונה
hr: provolone
hu: provolone, provolone sajt
id: Provolone
it: provolone, formaggio provolone
ja: プロヴォローネ
ko: 프로볼로네
la: Provolone
nb: Provolone
nl: Provolone
pt: Provolone
ru: Проволоне
sw: Provolone
zh: 波羅伏洛芝士

en: Raclette
xx: raclette
ar: راكليتي
be: Раклет
bg: Раклет
ca: formatge de raclet
eo: Rakledo
he: רקלט
hu: Raclette sajt
hy: Ռակլետ
ja: ラクレット
ru: Раклет
sh: Raklet
sr: Raklet
uk: Раклет
zh: 拉可雷特芝士

en: reblochon
xx: reblochon
ar: ريبلوتشون
fr: fromage reblochon
he: רבלושון
hu: reblochon sajt
ko: 르블로숑
ru: реблошон
uk: Реблошон
zh: 瑞布羅申芝士

en: red leicester, red leicester cheese
af: red leicester
cy: Caws Caerlŷr
de: Red Leicester, red leicester käse
es: Red Leicester
fi: Red Leicester
fr: Red Leicester, fromage red leicester
hr: crveni Leicester
id: Keju Leicester
it: Red Leicester
lt: Raudonasis Lesteršyras
nl: Red Leicester
no: Red Leicester
pl: Red Leicester
th: เรดเลสเตอร์
zh: 萊斯特芝士

en: regato, regato cheese, regato medium fat hard cheese
fr: regato, fromage regato
nl: regato kaas
sv: regato-ost

en: ricotta, ricotta cheese
af: Ricotta
ar: ريكوتا
az: Rikotta
be: Рыкота
bg: Рикота, сирене Рикота
bo: རི་ཀོ་ཏ།
bs: Ricotta
ca: Ricotta
cs: Ricotta
cv: Рикота
da: Ricotta
de: Ricotta
eo: Ricotta
es: Requesón
et: Ricotta, Ricotta juust
fa: ریکوتا
fi: Ricotta, ricottajuusto
fr: ricotta, fromage ricotta
fy: ricotta
he: ריקוטה
hr: ricotta, sir ricotta
hu: ricotta, ricotta sajt, ricotta savósajt
hy: Ռիկոտա
id: Ricotta
is: Ricotta
it: ricotta
ja: リコッタ
ko: 리코타
ms: Ricotta
nb: ricotta
nl: ricotta
pl: ricotta, ser ricotta
pt: requeijão
ro: Ricotta
ru: Рикотта
sl: Rikota
sq: Gjiza
sv: ricotta, ricottaost
tr: Ricotta
uk: Рікота
zh: 里考塔

en: roquefort, roquefort cheese, Roquefort cheese from ewe's milk
xx: roquefort
ar: روكفور
az: Rokfor pendiri
bg: рокфор
bo: རོ་ཀ་ཧྥོར།
ca: rocafort
cv: Рокфор
el: τυρί Pοκφόρ, Ροκφόρ
eo: Rokforto
es: roquefort, queso roquefort
et: Roqueforti juust
eu: Roquefort
fa: روکفور
fr: Roquefort au lait cru de Brebis
hu: Rokfort, Rokfort sajt
hy: Ռոկֆոր
ja: ロックフォール
ko: 로크포르
lo: ເນີຍແຂງລົກຟອກ
lv: rokfors
nl: roquefort kaas
oc: Ròcafòrt
ru: Рокфор
sl: Rokfor
sv: Roquefortost
tr: Rokfor peyniri
uk: Рокфор
zh: 罗克福干酪

en: saint nectaire
xx: saint nectaire, Saint-Nectaire AOC
ar: ساينت نيكتاير
hy: Սեն Նեկտեր
ja: サン＝ネクテール
oc: Sant Nectàrie
ru: Сен-Нектер
uk: Сен-Нектер
zh: 圣内克泰尔